klingon.lexc
LEXICON VerbType1Suffix ! 2 Count = reflexive/reciprocal
[REFLEXIVE]@R.OBJECT.NONE@:@R.OBJECT.NONE@'egh				VerbSuffix;
[RECIPROCAL]@U.VERBTYPE.DYNAMIC@@U.SUBJECT.PLURAL@@R.OBJECT.NONE@:@U.VERBTYPE.DYNAMIC@@U.SUBJECT.PLURAL@@R.OBJECT.NONE@chuq		VerbSuffix; ! "Intransitive verbs cannot take this suffix" -Klingon Grammar, Wikipedia; "This suffix is used only with plural subjects ... The prefix set indicating ``no object'' is also used when this suffix is used." -The Klingon Dictionary


LEXICON VerbType2Gate
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@D.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@		VerbType2Suffix;

! Example: {chop} <to bite>  {jIchoprup} <I am prepared to bite>

LEXICON VerbType2Suffix ! 5 Count = volition/necessity
[REQUIRED]:nIS					VerbSuffix;
[WILLING]:qang					VerbSuffix;
[PREPARED]:rup					VerbSuffix;
[SET-UP]:beH					VerbSuffix;
[AFRAID]:vIp					VerbSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType3Gate
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@D.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@		VerbType3Suffix;

! Example: {Qong} <to sleep>  {Qongqa'} <to resume sleeping>

LEXICON VerbType3Suffix ! 2 Count = inceptive/inchoative
[STATECHANGE]:choH				VerbSuffix;
[RESUME]:qa'					VerbSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType4Gate
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@D.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@		VerbType4Suffix;

! Example: {Qong} <to sleep>  {QongmoH} <to cause to sleep>

LEXICON VerbType4Suffix ! 1 Count = causative
[CAUSATIVE]:moH					VerbSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType5Gate
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@D.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@		VerbType5Suffix;

! Example: {Qong} <to sleep>  {jIQonglaH} <I am capable of sleeping>

LEXICON VerbType5Suffix ! 2 Count = undefined subject; capability
[UNDEFINED-SUBJ]@R.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@@C.INDICATIVE@:@R.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@@C.INDICATIVE@lu'				VerbSuffix;
[CAPABLE]:laH					VerbSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType6Gate
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@@D.VERBTYPE6.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@		VerbType6Suffix;

! Example: {yaj} <to understand>  {luyajlaw’} <they seem to understand it>

LEXICON VerbType6Suffix ! 4 Count = perfection; uncertainty
[BEST]:chu'					VerbSuffix;
[CERTAIN]:bej					VerbSuffix;
[UNCERTAIN]:law'				VerbSuffix;
[OBVIOUS]:ba'					VerbSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType7Gate
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@@D.VERBTYPE7.ON@@P.VERBTYPE7.ON@		VerbType7Suffix;

! Example: {ghor} <to break>  {vIghorta’} <I broke it (on purpose)>

LEXICON VerbType7Suffix ! 4 Count = aspect
[PERFECT]:pu'					VerbSuffix;
[PERFECTPURPOSE]:ta'				VerbSuffix;
[CONTINUOUS]@P.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@:@P.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@taH		VerbSuffix;
[CONTINUOUSEND]:lI'				VerbSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType8Gate
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@@P.VERBTYPE7.ON@@D.VERBTYPE8.ON@@P.VERBTYPE8.ON@		VerbType8Suffix;

! Example: {qaleghneS} <I am honored to see you> ({legh} <see>)

LEXICON VerbType8Suffix ! 1 Count = honorific
[HONOR]:neS					VerbSuffix;


LEXICON VerbType9Gate
@P.VERBTYPE1.ON@@P.VERBTYPE2.ON@@P.VERBTYPE3.ON@@P.VERBTYPE4.ON@@P.VERBTYPE5.ON@@P.VERBTYPE6.ON@@P.VERBTYPE7.ON@@P.VERBTYPE8.ON@@D.VERBTYPE9.ON@@P.VERBTYPE9.ON@		VerbType9Suffix;

! Example: jachnISchoH to start to need to scream → jachnISchoHwI’ someone who starts needing to scream

LEXICON VerbType9Suffix ! 11 Count = syntactic
@U.MOOD.INFINITIVE@[PERSON]:@U.MOOD.INFINITIVE@wI'					NounSuffix; ! Nominalizer. Verbs can take the Type 9 suffix -wI' one/thing which does, and the resulting word is a noun which can take all noun suffixes. Other verb suffixes can be added before -wI', provided no other Type 9 suffix is used.
[DVN]:ghach					VerbSuffix; ! Nominalizer, '-ness' "Turns a verb (which must have at least one other suffix attached) into a noun. The use of this suffix often makes for bad Klingon, and it is strongly suggested that you refrain from using any word with -ghach, unless it is found in the dictionary." -http://klingonska.org/dict/suffix.html
[INTEROGATIVE]:'a'				VerbSuffix; ! Modal
[OPTATIVE]:jaj					VerbSuffix; ! Modal
[BEFORE]:pa'					VerbSuffix; ! Subordinator
[SIMULTANEOUS]@R.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@:vIS@R.VERBSUFFIX.CONTINUOUS@				VerbSuffix; ! Subordinator - It is always used in conjunction with the type-7 suffix continuous suffix -taH.
[AFTER]:DI'					VerbSuffix; ! Subordinator
[CONDITIONAL]:chugh				VerbSuffix; ! Cause and effect
[CAUSE]:mo'					VerbSuffix; ! Cause and effect
[RELATIVE]:bogh					VerbSuffix; ! Relative and purpose clause
[PURPOSE]:meH					VerbSuffix; ! Relative and purpose clause


LEXICON VerbMoodTag
[INDICATIVE]@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@@D.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@:@U.MOOD.INDICATIVE@@D.INDICATIVE.UNSPECIFIED@			#;
[IMPERATIVE]@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@:@U.MOOD.IMPERATIVE@										#;


 
! ##########################
! ########## NOUN ##########
! ##########################
! NOUN SUFFIX EXAMPLE: {DujoymeyqoqwIjDaq} <on my so-called dear ships>
! vengHommeyqoqchajDaq
! veng	-	Hom	-	mey	-	qoq	-	chaj	-	Daq
! city	+	(1) diminutive	+	(2) plural	+	(3) dubitative	+	(4) their	+	(5) locative
! in their so-called villages


LEXICON Noun
@U.NOUNTYPE.BODYPART@				NounBodyPart;
@U.NOUNTYPE.CAPABLELANGUAGE@			NounCapableOfLanguage;
@U.NOUNTYPE.OTHER@				NounOther;
@U.NOUNTYPE.LOCATION@				NounOtherLocation;

! LEXICON NounName
! be'etor[B'Etor]:be'etor			NounSuffix;

LEXICON NounBodyPart
DeS[arm]:DeS					NounSuffix;
porgh[body]:porgh				NounSuffix;
mIn[eye]:mIn					NounSuffix;
nItlh[finger]:nItlh				NounSuffix;
ro'[fist]:ro'					NounSuffix;
qam[foot]:qam					NounSuffix;
ghop[hand]:ghop					NounSuffix;
nach[head]:nach					NounSuffix;
'uS[leg]:'uS					NounSuffix;
nuj[mouth]:nuj					NounSuffix;
ghIch[nose]:ghIch				NounSuffix;
tlhon[nostril]:tlhon				NounSuffix;
DIr[skin]:DIr					NounSuffix;
Ho'[tooth]:Ho'					NounSuffix;


LEXICON NounCapableOfLanguage
nov[alien,foreigner,outsider]:nov		NounSuffix;
pIn[boss]:pIn					NounSuffix;
loDHom[boy]:loDHom				NounSuffix;
loDnI'[brother]:loDnI'				NounSuffix;
je'wI'[buyer]:je'wI'				NounSuffix;
HoD[captain]:HoD				NounSuffix;
puq[child,offspring]:puq			NounSuffix;
nuch[coward]:nuch				NounSuffix;
puqbe'[daughter]puqbe'				NounSuffix;
jagh[enemy]:jagh				NounSuffix;
vav[father]:vav					NounSuffix;
jup[friend]:jup					NounSuffix;
be'Hom[girl]:be'Hom				NounSuffix;
meb[guest]:meb					NounSuffix;
baHwI'[gunner]:baHwI'				NounSuffix;
DeghwI'[helmsman]:DeghwI'			NounSuffix;
loDnal[husband]:loDnal				NounSuffix;
ngan[inhabitant]:ngan				NounSuffix;
joH[lord]:joH					NounSuffix;
loD[male,man]:loD				NounSuffix;
yaS[officer]:yaS				NounSuffix;
ghot[person]:ghot				NounSuffix;
nuv[person,humanoid]:nuv			NounSuffix;
Duy[representative]:Duy			NounSuffix;
qetwI'[runner]:qetwI'				NounSuffix;
bu'[sergeant]:bu'				NounSuffix;
be'nI'[sister]:be'nI'				NounSuffix;
puqloD[son]:puqloD				NounSuffix;
be'nal[wife]:be'nal				NounSuffix;
be'[woman]:be'					NounSuffix;


LEXICON NounOtherLocation
naDev[hereabouts]:naDev			NounSuffix;
pa'[there,over-there]:pa'			NounSuffix;
Dat[everywhere]:Dat				NounSuffix;


LEXICON NounSuffix
						NounType1Suffix;

LEXICON NounType1Suffix ! size, affection
[AUGMENTATIVE]:'a'				NounType2Suffix; 
[DIMINUTIVE]:Hom				NounType2Suffix;
[ENDEARMENT]:-oy				NounType2Suffix; ! The dash character will either be discarded or turned into a glottal stop in the foma file
						NounType2Suffix; ! Type 1 suffix not required, jump to next type

! Example: {SuS} <wind, breeze>  {SuS'a'} <strong wind>  {SuSHom} <wisp of air>  {cha’oy} <dear torpedos>

LEXICON NounOther
laH[ability]:laH				NounSuffix;
latlh[additional-one]:latlh			NounSuffix;
Hoch[all,everything]:Hoch			NounSuffix;
Ha'DIbaH[animal,meat]:Ha'DIbaH			NounSuffix;
chav[achievement]:chav				NounSuffix;
pov[afternoon]:pov				NounSuffix;
ngup[authority]:ngup				NounSuffix;
may'[battle]:may'				NounSuffix;
paq[book]:paq					NounSuffix;
DaS[boot]:DaS					NounSuffix;
nIQ[breakfast]:nIQ				NounSuffix;
tlhuH[breath]:tlhuH				NounSuffix;
quS[chair]:quS					NounSuffix;
choH[change]:choH				NounSuffix;
veng[city]:veng					NounSuffix;
qoj[cliff]:qoj					NounSuffix;
wep[coat]:wep					NounSuffix;
mID[colony]:mID					NounSuffix;
De'wI'[computer]:De'wI'			NounSuffix;
Hatlh[country]:Hatlh				NounSuffix;
He[course,route]:He				NounSuffix;
De'[data,information]:De'			NounSuffix;
jaj[day]:jaj					NounSuffix;
pem[daytime]:pem				NounSuffix;
QIH[destruction]:QIH				NounSuffix;
mu'ghom[dictionary]:mu'ghom			NounSuffix;
lojmIt[door,gate]:lojmIt			NounSuffix;
bov[era]:bov					NounSuffix;
Qagh[error]:error				NounSuffix;
wanI'[event]:wanI'				NounSuffix;
ngoD[fact]:ngoD					NounSuffix;
San[fate]:San					NounSuffix;
Soj[food]:Soj					NounSuffix;
ngem[forest,woods]:ngem			NounSuffix;
nob[gift]:nob					NounSuffix;
HIvje'[glass,tumble]:HIvje'			NounSuffix;
ngoQ[goal,purpose]:ngoQ			NounSuffix;
pab[grammar]:pab				NounSuffix;
ghom[group]:ghom				NounSuffix;
tuj[hot]:tuj					NounSuffix;
QaH[help]:QaH					NounSuffix;
Degh[helm]:Degh					NounSuffix;
juH[home,house]:juH				NounSuffix;
quv[honor]:quv					NounSuffix;
qach[idea]:qach					NounSuffix;
Hol[language]:Hol				NounSuffix;
ngeng[lake]:ngeng				NounSuffix;
yIn[life]:yIn					NounSuffix;
bang[love]:bang					NounSuffix;
ghItlh[manuscript]:ghItlh			NounSuffix;
yab[mind,brain]:yab				NounSuffix;
Qu'[mission]:Qu'				NounSuffix;
Qagh[mistake]:Qagh				NounSuffix;
jar[month]:jar					NounSuffix;
maS[moon]:maS					NounSuffix;
po[morning]:po					NounSuffix;
pong[name]:pong					NounSuffix;
Dap[nonsense]:Dap				NounSuffix;
mu'tay'[noun]:mu'tay'				NounSuffix;
pagh[nothing,none,no-one]:pagh			NounSuffix;
nav[paper]:nav					NounSuffix;
roj[peace]:roj					NounSuffix;
Saj[pet]:Saj					NounSuffix;
pu'[phaser]:pu'					NounSuffix;
yuQ[planet]:yuQ					NounSuffix;
bel[pleasure]:bel				NounSuffix;
woQ[power]:woQ					NounSuffix;
meq[reason,motive]:meq				NounSuffix;
bortaS[revenge]:bortaS				NounSuffix;
Daw'[revolution]:Daw'				NounSuffix;
pa'[room]:pa'					NounSuffix;
pegh[secret]:pegh				NounSuffix;
mu'tlhegh[sentence]:mu'tlhegh			NounSuffix;
QIb[shadow]:QIb					NounSuffix;
Duj[ship,vessel]:Duj				NounSuffix;
leSpoH[short-leave]:leSpoH			NounSuffix;
bach[shot]:bach					NounSuffix;
ghu'[situation]:ghu'				NounSuffix;
chal[sky]:chal					NounSuffix;
bom[song]:bom					NounSuffix;
Hal[source]:Hal					NounSuffix;
baghneQ[spoon]:baghneQ				NounSuffix;
Hov[star]:Hov					NounSuffix;
Dotlh[status]:Dotlh				NounSuffix;
lut[story]:lut					NounSuffix;
pat[system]:pat					NounSuffix;
targh[targ]:targh				NounSuffix; ! A "targ" is a Klingon animal somewhat resembling a boar
DoS[target]@P.SINGULAR.IRREGULAR@:DoS@P.SINGULAR.IRREGULAR@		NounSuffix;
ray'[targets]@P.PLURAL.IRREGULAR@:ray'@P.PLURAL.IRREGULAR@		NounSuffix;
nger[theory]nger				NounSuffix;
Doch[thing]:Doch				NounSuffix;
vIj[thruster]@P.SINGULAR.IRREGULAR@:vIj@P.SINGULAR.IRREGULAR@	NounSuffix;
chuyDaH[thrusters]@P.PLURAL.IRREGULAR@:chuyDaH@P.PLURAL.IRREGULAR@	NounSuffix;
poH[time]:poH					NounSuffix;
DaHjaj[today]:DaHjaj				NounSuffix;
peng[torpedo]@P.SINGULAR.IRREGULAR@:peng@P.SINGULAR.IRREGULAR@	NounSuffix;
cha[torpedoes]@P.PLURAL.IRREGULAR@:cha@P.PLURAL.IRREGULAR@		NounSuffix;
Seng[trouble]:Seng				NounSuffix;
ghogh[voice]:ghogh				NounSuffix;
bIQ[water]:bIQ					NounSuffix;
nuH[weapon]:nuH					NounSuffix;
Hogh[week]:Hogh					NounSuffix;
SuS[wind,breeze]:SuS				NounSuffix;
mu'[word]:mu'					NounSuffix;
DIS[year]:DIS					NounSuffix;
vogh[somewhere]:vogh				NounSuffix;
nIH[right-side]:nIH				NounSuffix;
poS[left-side]:poS				NounSuffix;
tlhop[area-in-front]:tlhop			NounSuffix;
Dung[area-above]:Dung				NounSuffix;
bIng[area-below]:bIng				NounSuffix;
retlh[area-beside]:retlh			NounSuffix;
joj[area-between]:joj				NounSuffix;
qoD[inside]:qoD					NounSuffix;
Hur[outside]:Hur				NounSuffix;
